Utah statutes.
70C-8-201.   Applicability.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this part applies to:

(a)  a creditor that is subject to this title; and

(b)  a party who:

(i)  has an office or place of business in this state; and

(ii)  takes an assignment of or undertakes direct collection of a payment from or enforcement of a right against a debtor arising from a consumer credit transaction.

(2)  Except where otherwise indicated, the following are exempt from this part:

(a)  a depository institution as defined in Section 7-1-103 that is federally insured; and

(b)  a wholly owned subsidiary of a depository institution described in Subsection (2)(a).



Amended by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

